Maine, session 132, LD603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9722, sub-§6, ¶B-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 527, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) That building materials from local sawmills, including but not limited to
nongraded lumber, are permissible under the Maine Uniform Building and Energy
Code; and
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §9722, sub-§6, ¶B-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 527, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) That buildings used to house livestock, store harvested crops or cultivate crops
are not subject to the Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code. The exemption
in this subparagraph does not include the cultivation of cannabis regulated under
Title 22 or 28‑B.; and
Sec. 3. 10 MRSA §9722, sub-§6, ¶B-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 527, §1, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) That buildings used primarily to process or store maple sap or syrup are not
subject to the Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code;
Page 1 - 132LR1214(02)